Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.010

Purpose.

The purpose of chapter 266, Laws of 1994 is to establish a flexible process by which local governments enter into service agreements that will establish which jurisdictions should provide various local government services and facilities within specified geographic areas and how those services and facilities will be financed.

[ 1994 c 266 s 1.]